Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1911
Exempted product; adulterated or misbranded; seized by inspector; when.

Whenever any livestock product or poultry product or any product exempted from the definition of a livestock product and from the definition of a poultry product, or any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased livestock or poultry, is found by any authorized representative of the director upon any premises where it is held for purposes of distribution, or during or after distribution, in intrastate commerce or is otherwise subject to the Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law, and the authorized representative or inspector has reason to believe that any such article is adulterated or misbranded and is capable of use as human food, or that it has not been inspected and fails to bear an official mark or is otherwise in violation of the Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law or of the federal acts or the Nebraska Pure Food Act, or that such article or animal has been or is intended to be distributed in violation of any such provisions, it may be seized and embargoed by such representative or inspector for a period not to exceed twenty days, pending action under section 54-1912 or notification of any federal authorities having jurisdiction over such article or animal, and shall not be moved by any person from the place at which it is located when so seized or embargoed until released by an inspector or representative of the department or by an order of a court having jurisdiction. All official marks may be required by such representative or inspector to be removed from such article or animal before it is released unless it appears to the satisfaction of the director that the article or animal is eligible to retain such mark or marks.

Laws 1969, c. 449, § 11, p. 1516;

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 44;

Laws 2021, LB324, § 6.

Nebraska Pure Food Act, see section 81-2,239.